Oklahoma, session 2025, SB403.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 1501, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 94, O.S.L. 2022 (19 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 1501), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1501. A. The county purchasing agent:
1. Shall, within the amount of the unencumbered balance, make
all purchases that are paid from county funds for the various
institutions, departments, officers, and employees of the county,
except at public auctions and as otherwise provided for by law;
2. May make purchases for political subdivisions of this state
within the county if authorized by appropriate action of the
governing board or body of the political subdivision affected;

3. Shall make purchases and rental or lease-purchase agreements
only after following the bidding procedures as provided for by law,
except:
a. when the purchase does not exceed Twenty-five Thousand
Dollars ($25,000.00) by department. All purchases
made pursuant to this subparagraph shall be by a
single purchase order. Splitting purchase orders
which would result in paying an amount in excess of
the limitations specified in this subparagraph is
expressly prohibited. Any person convicted of
violating the provisions of this subparagraph shall be
guilty of a misdemeanor and such person shall forfeit
the person’s position or office,
b. when the total payments of a rental or lease-purchase
agreement do not exceed the current bid limit as
established in subparagraph a of this paragraph,
c. when articles and items are covered by single-source
contracts,
d. service or maintenance contracts on equipment or
machinery which are entered into at the time of the
purchase of the equipment or machinery,
e. purchases made pursuant to a blanket purchase order as
provided for in Section 310.8 of Title 62 of the
Oklahoma Statutes,
f. when materials for road or bridge improvements do not
exceed Seven Dollars ($7.00) per yard or per ton,
g. purchases of fuel if the county purchasing agent
obtains quotes from at least three vendors prior to
the purchase and the lowest and best quote is
selected. Documentation of these quotes shall be
recorded in the permanent records of the clerk,
h. purchases of tools, apparatus, machinery, or equipment
from a state agency or a political subdivision of the
ENR. S. B. NO. 403 Page 2

state as provided for in subsection C of Section 421.1
of this title,
i. purchases of food for prisoners incarcerated in the
county jail; provided, in counties having a population
in excess of one hundred thousand (100,000) persons,
the county purchasing agent shall follow bidding
procedures as provided by law unless the county
purchasing agent obtains quotes pursuant to the whole
total of food items requisitioned prior to the
purchase and the lowest and best quote is selected.
Documentation of these quotes shall be recorded in the
permanent records of the county clerk,
j. when a county solicits bids for the purchase of
processed native materials for road and bridge
improvements, the county may accept all bids received,
with the lowest and best bid from those accepted to be
selected at the time of opening of any construction
project. The selection of the bid shall be based upon
availability, bid price, plus and transportation
costs,
k. when a vendor has been selected as the lowest and best
bidder to furnish a particular item or items to the
county during a specified time period and in the event
the vendor is unable to perform, the purchasing agent
may solicit telephone quotes for the item or items
needed or select the next lowest and best bidder from
the list of qualified bidders and provide for the
purchase of the items at the lowest and best quote
available. All vendors submitting bids for the
specific product or service will be considered at or
below the amount they bid,
l. when considering the purchase of an item or items from
the state bid list as provided by the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services or the General
Services Administration, if the same exact item is
available from a local vendor at or below the price
listed on the state bid list or the General Services
ENR. S. B. NO. 403 Page 3

Administration list, the item may be obtained from the
vendor,
m. any item or items bid by the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services which may be purchased by the
county, provided the vendor is willing to supply the
item or items to the county at the bid price,
n. when a county obtains proceeds from the sale of its
property at a public auction, that county may use
those proceeds to acquire items previously identified
as needed by the county at the same public auction
pursuant to subsection D of Section 1505 of this
title,
o. when an item or items have been competitively bid by a
county, or on behalf of a group of counties, provided:
(1) the notice to bidders shall list each county
which may participate in the purchase of the item
or items being bid,
(2) the notice of bid is advertised, as provided by
law, in each of the counties which may
participate in the purchase of the item or items,
(3) all vendors on the list of qualified bidders of
each participating county who offer the item or
items for sale received notice of the bid
request, and
(4) the vendor awarded the bid is willing and able to
provide the item or items at the bid price,
p. counties may participate in a nationwide purchasing
program sponsored by the national association
representing counties and local cooperative
procurement agreements entered into by the counties
and other local jurisdictions or any other
competitively bid nationwide purchasing program, or
ENR. S. B. NO. 403 Page 4

q. when the Governor declares an emergency in a county,
the district attorney of that county shall have the
authority to temporarily waive competitive bidding
procedures for purchases that may expedite a response
to the emergency situation. This temporary waiver
shall be in addition to any powers exercised pursuant
to Section 683.11 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes.
The purchases shall be paid by attaching properly itemized
invoices, as described in Section 1505 of this title, to a purchase
order which has been prepared by the county purchasing agent and
submitting both to the county clerk for filing, encumbering, and
consideration for payment by the board of county commissioners;
4. Shall not furnish any supplies, materials, equipment, or
other articles, except upon receipt of a requisition signed by a
county officer. Written requisitions will not be required for
blanket purchase orders as provided for in Section 310.8 of Title 62
of the Oklahoma Statutes. Each county officer may designate not
more than two employees who also shall be authorized to sign
requisitions in the absence of the county officer. A written
designation of the employees shall be filed with the county clerk
and shall be entered in the minutes of the board of county
commissioners. The county may designate two individuals who are not
county employees for each of the following entities within the
county to act as receiving and requisitioning officers:
a. fire protection districts organized and operated
pursuant to the provisions of Sections 901.1 through
901.29 of this title,
b. fire protection services established pursuant to the
provisions of Section 351 of this title,
c. volunteer or full-time fire departments established
pursuant to Section 592 of Title 18 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, and
d. municipal fire departments organized and operated
pursuant to the provisions of Sections 29-101 through
ENR. S. B. NO. 403 Page 5

29-108 and Sections 29-201 through 29-204 29-115 of
Title 11 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
A written designation of these individuals shall be filed with
the county clerk and shall be entered in the minutes of the board of
county commissioners meeting in which the designations are made.
Further, entities described in subparagraphs a, b, c, and d of this
paragraph, choosing to have any nonemployee of the county designated
as a receiving and requisitioning officer shall provide evidence of
blanket bond coverage or employee dishonesty liability insurance for
each such designee;
5. Shall make lease or lease-purchase agreements for road
machinery and equipment if the county has adequate funds
appropriated during any fiscal year for such purpose and only after
following the bidding procedures as provided for in Section 1505 of
this title. The term of any lease or lease-purchase agreement
authorized pursuant to this paragraph may be for any period up to
one (1) year; provided, the term shall not extend beyond the end of
any fiscal year, with an option to renew such agreement subject to
the requirement that adequate funds are appropriated during the
fiscal year by the county for such purpose. The Office of the State
Auditor and Inspector’s Office Inspector shall be notified by the
county of the terms and conditions of a lease or lease-purchase
agreement authorized pursuant to this paragraph before any such
agreement is made by the county purchasing agent; and
6. Shall perform such other duties as may be delegated by the
appointing authority or as may be provided for by law.
B. Each department of county government needing repairs to
equipment, machinery, or vehicles shall make estimates and
requisition a purchase order from the county purchasing agent for
repairs not in excess of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00). Repairs
in excess of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) shall be submitted on
a blanket purchase order as provided in Section 310.8 of Title 62 of
the Oklahoma Statutes.
C. Each department of county government needing repairs to
heavy equipment, meaning equipment in excess of ten thousand
(10,000) pounds, shall make estimates and requisition a purchase
order from the county purchasing agent for repairs not in excess of
ENR. S. B. NO. 403 Page 6

Thirty Thousand Dollars ($30,000.00). Repairs in excess of Thirty
Thousand Dollars ($30,000.00) shall be submitted on a blanket
purchase order as provided in Section 310.8 of Title 62 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 1505, as
amended by Section 3, Chapter 94, O.S.L. 2022 (19 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 1505), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1505. The following procedures shall be used by
counties for the requisition, purchase, lease-purchase, rental, and
receipt of supplies, materials, road and bridge construction
services, equipment and information technology and telecommunication
goods, and other services, except for professional services as
defined in Section 803 of Title 18 of the Oklahoma Statutes, for the
maintenance, operation, and capital expenditures of county
government unless otherwise provided for by law.
A. The procedure for requisitioning items for county offices
shall be as follows:
1. The requesting department shall prepare a requisition form
in triplicate. The requisition shall contain any specifications for
an item as deemed necessary by the requesting department. The form
shall be prescribed by the State Auditor and Inspector;
2. The requesting department shall retain a copy of the
requisition and forward the original requisition and a copy to the
county purchasing agent; and
3. Upon receipt of the requisition, the county purchasing
agent, within two (2) working days, shall begin the bidding and
purchasing process as provided for in this section. Nothing in this
section shall prohibit the transfer of supplies, materials, or
equipment between county departments upon a written agreement
between county officers.
B. The bid procedure for selecting a vendor for the purchase,
lease-purchase, or rental of supplies, materials, equipment, and
information technology and telecommunication goods and services used
by a county shall be as follows:
ENR. S. B. NO. 403 Page 7

1. The county purchasing agent shall request written
recommendations from all county officers pertaining to needed or
commonly used supplies, materials, road and bridge construction
services, equipment, and information technology and
telecommunication goods and services. From such recommendations and
available requisition, purchase, or inventory records, the county
purchasing agent shall prepare a list of items needed or commonly
used by county officers. The county purchasing agent shall request
from the Purchasing Division or from the Information Services
Division in the case of information technology and telecommunication
goods and services of the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services all contracts quoting the price the state is paying for the
items. The county purchasing agent shall either request the
Purchasing Division or the Information Services Division of the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services, as applicable, to make
the purchase for the county or the county purchasing agent shall
solicit bids for unit prices on the items for periods of not to
exceed twelve (12) months in the manner described in paragraph 2 of
this subsection. If the county purchasing agent receives a
requisition for an item for which the county purchasing agent does
not have a current bid, the county purchasing agent shall request
from the Purchasing Division or the Information Services Division of
the Office of Management and Enterprise Services, as applicable, all
contracts quoting the price the state is paying for the item. The
county purchasing agent shall either request the Purchasing Division
or the Information Services Division of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services, as applicable, to make the purchase for the
county or the county purchasing agent shall solicit bids in the
manner described in paragraph 2 of this subsection. Nothing in this
paragraph shall prohibit bids from being taken on an item currently
on a twelve-month bid list, at any time deemed necessary by the
county purchasing agent. Whenever the county purchasing agent deems
it necessary to take a bid on an item currently on a twelve-month
bid list, the reason for the bid shall be entered into the minutes
of the board of county commissioners;
2. Bids shall be solicited by mailing or emailing a notice to
all persons or firms who have made a written request of the county
purchasing agent that they be notified of such bid solicitation and
to all other persons or firms who might reasonably be expected to
submit bids. Notice of solicitation of bids shall also be published
one time in a newspaper of general circulation in the county.
ENR. S. B. NO. 403 Page 8

Notices shall be mailed and published at least ten (10) days prior
to the date on which the bids are opened. Proof of the mailing or
emailing shall be made by the affidavit of the person mailing or
emailing the request for bids and shall be made a part of the
official records of the county purchasing agent. The notice shall
specify whether the county will consider written bids, electronic
bids, or both; the decision to exclusively consider either written
bids or electronic bids shall be determined pursuant to an
affirmative vote of the board of county commissioners. Whenever any
prospective supplier or vendor dealing in or listing for sale any
particular item or article required to be purchased or acquired by
sealed bids fails to enter or offer a sealed bid for three
successive bid solicitations, the name of the supplier or vendor may
be dropped from the mailing lists of the board of county
commissioners;
3. The sealed bids received from vendors and the state contract
price received from the applicable Division division of the Office
of Management and Enterprise Services shall be given to the county
clerk by the county purchasing agent. The county clerk shall
forward the sealed bids and state contract price, if any, to the
board of county commissioners;
4. The board of county commissioners, in an open meeting, shall
open the sealed bids and compare them to the state contract price.
The board of county commissioners shall select the lowest and best
bid based upon, if applicable, the availability of material and
transportation cost to the job site within thirty (30) days of the
meeting. For any special item not included on the list of needed or
commonly used items, the requisitioning official shall review the
bids and submit a written recommendation to the board before final
approval. The board of county commissioners shall keep a written
record of the meeting as required by law, and any time the lowest
bid was not considered to be the lowest and best bid, the reason for
such conclusion shall be recorded. Whenever the board of county
commissioners rejects the written recommendation of the
requisitioning official pertaining to a special item, the reasons
for the rejection shall be entered in their minutes and stated in a
letter to the requisitioning official and county purchasing agent;
5. The county purchasing agent shall notify the successful
bidders and shall maintain a copy of the notification. The county
ENR. S. B. NO. 403 Page 9

purchasing agent shall prepare and maintain a vendors list
specifying the successful bidders and shall notify each county
officer of the list. The county purchasing agent may remove any
vendor from such list who refuses to provide goods or services as
provided by contract if the removal is authorized by the board of
county commissioners. The county purchasing agent may make
purchases from the successful remaining bidders for a price at or
below the bid price. If a vendor who is the low bidder cannot or
will not sell goods or services as required by a county bid
contract, the county purchasing agent may make a one-time purchase
from the next lowest or best quote or take quotations as provided in
paragraph 6 of this subsection; provided, however, such purchase
does not exceed Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) as the
amount specified in subparagraph a of paragraph 3 of subsection A of
Section 1501 of this title; and
6. When bids have been solicited as provided for by law and no
bids have been received, the procedure shall be as follows:
a. the county purchasing agent shall determine if
potential vendors are willing to commit to a firm
price for a reduced period of time, and, if such is
the case, the bid procedure described in this
subsection shall be followed,
b. if vendors are not willing to commit to a firm price
for a reduced period, the purchasing agent shall
solicit and record at least three quotes of current
prices available to the county and authorize the
purchase of goods or services based on the lowest and
best quote as it becomes necessary to acquire such
goods or services. The quotes shall be recorded on a
form prescribed by the State Auditor and Inspector and
shall be attached to the purchase order and filed with
the county clerk’s copy of the purchase order. Any
time the lowest quote was not considered to be the
lowest and best quote, the reason for this conclusion
shall be recorded by the county purchasing agent and
transmitted to the county clerk, or
c. if three quotes are not available, a memorandum to the
county clerk from the county purchasing agent shall
ENR. S. B. NO. 403 Page 10

describe the basis upon which a purchase is
authorized. The memorandum shall state the reasons
why the price for such a purchase is the lowest and
best under the circumstances. The county clerk shall
then attach the memorandum to the county clerk’s copy
of the purchase order and file both in the office of
the county clerk.
C. After selection of a vendor, the procedure for the purchase,
lease-purchase, or rental of supplies, materials, road and bridge
construction services, equipment, and information technology and
telecommunication goods and services used by a county shall be as
follows:
1. The county purchasing agent shall prepare a purchase order
in quadruplicate and submit it with a copy of the requisition to the
county clerk;
2. The county clerk shall then encumber the amount stated on
the purchase order and assign a sequential number to the purchase
order;
3. If there is an unencumbered balance in the appropriation
made for that purpose by the county excise board, the county clerk
shall so certify in the following form:
“I hereby certify that the amount of this encumbrance has been
entered against the designated appropriation accounts and that this
encumbrance is within the authorized available balance of the
appropriation.
Dated this ________ day of ________, 20__.
________________________________
County Clerk/Deputy
of _____________________ County.”.
In instances where it is impossible to ascertain the exact amount of
the indebtedness sought to be incurred at the time of recording the
encumbrance, an estimated amount may be used. No purchase order
ENR. S. B. NO. 403 Page 11

shall be valid unless signed by the county purchasing agent and
certified by the county clerk; and
4. The county clerk shall file the original purchase order and
return three copies to the county purchasing agent who shall file a
copy, retain a copy for the county road and bridge inventory officer
if the purchase order is for the purchase of equipment, supplies, or
materials for the construction or maintenance of roads and bridges,
and submit the other copy to the receiving officer of the requesting
department.
D. 1. The procedure for the purchase of supplies, materials,
equipment, and information technology and telecommunication goods
and services at public auction or by sealed bid to be used by a
county shall be as follows:
a. the county purchasing agent shall prepare a purchase
order in quadruplicate and submit it with a copy of
the requisition to the county clerk,
b. the county clerk shall then encumber the amount stated
on the purchase order and assign a sequential number
to the purchase order,
c. if there is an unencumbered balance in the
appropriation made for that purpose by the county
excise board, the county clerk shall so certify in the
following form:
“I hereby certify that the amount of this encumbrance
has been entered against the designated appropriation
accounts and that this encumbrance is within the
authorized available balance of the appropriation.
Dated this ________ day of ________, 20__.
________________________________
County Clerk/Deputy
of _____________________ County.”.
ENR. S. B. NO. 403 Page 12

In instances where it is impossible to ascertain the
exact amount of the indebtedness sought to be incurred
at the time of recording the encumbrance, an estimated
amount may be used. No purchase order shall be valid
unless signed by the county purchasing agent and
certified by the county clerk, and
d. the county clerk shall file the original purchase
order and return three copies to the county purchasing
agent who shall file a copy, retain a copy for the
county road and bridge inventory officer if the
purchase order is for the purchase of equipment,
supplies, or materials for the construction or
maintenance of roads and bridges, and submit the other
copy to the receiving officer of the requesting
department.
2. The procedure for the purchase of supplies, materials, and
equipment at a public auction when the purchase will be made with
the proceeds from the sale of county property at the same public
auction are is as follows:
a. the purchasing agent shall cause such items being sold
to be appraised in the manner determined in Section
421.1 of this title,
b. the county purchasing agent shall prepare a purchase
order in quadruplicate and submit it with a copy of
the requisition to the county clerk,
c. the county clerk shall then encumber the amount of the
appraised value and any additional funds obligated by
the county on the purchase order and assign a
sequential number to the purchase order,
d. the county clerk shall certify that the amount of the
encumbrance is equal to the appraised value of the
item being sold plus any additional funds obligated by
the county. In effect, the recording of the
encumbrance is an estimate that is authorized by law.
No purchase order shall be valid unless signed by the
ENR. S. B. NO. 403 Page 13

county purchasing agent and certified by the county
clerk,
e. the county clerk shall file the original purchase
order and return three copies to the county purchasing
agent who shall file a copy, retain a copy for the
county road and bridge inventory officer if the
purchase order is for the purchase of equipment,
supplies, or materials for the construction or
maintenance of roads and bridges, and submit the other
copy to the receiving officer of the requesting
department, and
f. a purchase shall not be bid until such time that the
appraised item or items are sold. Any item or items
purchased shall not exceed the appraised value plus
any additional funds obligated by the county or the
actual selling price of the item or items, whichever
is the lesser amount.
E. The procedure for the receipt of items shall be as follows:
1. A receiving officer for the requesting department shall be
responsible for receiving all items delivered to that department;
2. Upon the delivery of an item, the receiving officer shall
determine if a purchase order exists for the item being delivered;
3. If no such purchase order has been provided, the receiving
officer shall refuse delivery of the item;
4. If a purchase order is on file, the receiving officer shall
obtain a delivery ticket, bill of lading, or other delivery document
and compare it with the purchase order. If any item is back-
ordered, the back order and estimated date of delivery shall be
noted in the receiving report;
5. The receiving officer shall complete a receiving report in
quadruplicate which shall state the quantity and quality of goods
delivered. The receiving report form shall be prescribed by the
State Auditor and Inspector. The person delivering the goods shall
acknowledge the delivery by signature, noting the date and time;
ENR. S. B. NO. 403 Page 14

6. The receiving officer shall file the original receiving
report and submit:
a. a copy of the purchase order and a copy of the
receiving report to the county purchasing agent, and
b. a copy of the receiving report with the delivery
documentation to the county clerk;
7. The county purchasing agent shall file a copy of the
purchase order and a copy of the receiving report;
8. Upon receipt of the original receiving report and the
delivery documentation, the county clerk shall maintain a file until
such time as an invoice is received from the vendor;
9. The invoice shall state the name and address of the vendor
and must be sufficiently itemized to clearly describe each item
purchased, the unit price when applicable, the number or volume of
each item purchased, the total price, the total purchase price, and
the date of the purchase;
10. Upon receipt of an invoice, the county clerk shall compare
the following documents:
a. requisition,
b. purchase order,
c. invoice with noncollusion affidavit as required by
law,
d. receiving report, and
e. delivery document.
The documents shall be available for public inspection during
regular business hours; and
ENR. S. B. NO. 403 Page 15

11. If the documents conform as to the quantity and quality of
the items, the county clerk shall prepare a warrant for payment
according to procedures provided for by law.
F. The following procedures are for the processing of purchase
orders:
1. The purchasing agent shall be allowed up to three (3) days
to process purchase orders to be presented to the board of county
commissioners for consideration and payment. Nothing herein shall
prevent the purchasing agent from processing or the board of county
commissioners from consideration and payment of utilities, travel
claims, and payroll claims;
2. The board of county commissioners shall consider the
purchase orders so presented and act upon the purchase orders, by
allowing in full or in part or by holding for further information or
disallowing the same. The disposition of purchase orders shall be
indicated by the board of county commissioners, showing the amounts
allowed or disallowed, and shall be signed by at least two members
of the board of county commissioners. Any claim held over for
further information shall be acted upon by allowing or disallowing
same at any future meeting of the board held within seventy-five
(75) days from the date of filing of the purchase order. Any
purchase order not acted upon within the seventy-five (75) days from
the date of filing shall be deemed to have been disallowed, but such
disallowance shall not prevent the refiling of the purchase order at
the proper time; and
3. Whenever any allowance, either in whole or in part, is made
upon any purchase order presented to the board of county
commissioners and is accepted by the person making the claim, such
allowance shall be a full settlement of the entire purchase order
and provided that the cashing of warrant shall be considered as
acceptance by the claimant.
G. The procedure upon consumption or disposal of supplies,
materials, or equipment shall be as follows:
1. For consumable road or bridge items or materials, a
quarterly report of the road and bridge projects completed during
such period shall be prepared and kept on file by the consuming
ENR. S. B. NO. 403 Page 16

department. The quarterly report may be prepared and kept
electronically by the consuming department. The report shall
contain a record of the date, the place, and the purpose for the use
of the road or bridge items or materials. For purposes of
identifying county bridges, the board of county commissioners shall
number each bridge subject to its jurisdiction; and
2. For disposal of all equipment and information technology and
telecommunication goods which originally cost more than Five Hundred
Dollars ($500.00), resolution of disposal shall be submitted by the
officer on a form prescribed by the Office of the State Auditor and
Inspector’s Office Inspector to the board of county commissioners.
The approval of the resolution of disposal shall be entered into the
minutes of the board.
H. Inventory forms and reports shall be retained for not less
than two (2) years after all audit requirements for the state and
federal government have been fulfilled and after any pending
litigation involving the forms and reports has been resolved.
I. The procedures provided for in this section shall not apply
when a county officer certifies that an emergency exists requiring
an immediate expenditure of funds. Such an expenditure of funds
shall not exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00). The county
officer shall give the county purchasing agent a written explanation
of the emergency. The county purchasing agent shall attach the
written explanation to the purchase order. The purchases shall be
paid by attaching a properly itemized invoice, as described in this
section, to a purchase order which has been prepared by the county
purchasing agent and submitting them to the county clerk for filing,
encumbering, and consideration for payment by the board of county
commissioners.
J. The county purchasing agent may authorize county purchasing
officers to make acquisitions through the state purchase card
program as authorized by the State Purchasing Director in accordance
with Section 85.5 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes and defined
in Section 85.2 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes. Purchase
cardholders A purchase cardholder shall sign a purchase card
agreement prior to becoming a cardholder and attend purchase card
procedure training as required by the State Purchasing Director.
Complete descriptions of purchases made by county government
ENR. S. B. NO. 403 Page 17

entities shall be published through the state transparency portal
pursuant to Section 85.33B of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and
as warrants required to be published pursuant to Sections 444 and
445 of this title.
K. Nothing in this section shall prohibit counties from
providing material and/or services bids on the twelve-month bid list
to all road and bridge projects and contracts. All non-road and
bridge related construction contracts shall refer to subsection A of
Section 103 of Title 61 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 403 Page 18

Passed the Senate the 24th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 29th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 403 Page 19